Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-405] Federal covered investment
adviser notice filing requirement. (a) Except with respect to a federal
covered investment adviser described in subsection (b), it is unlawful for a
federal covered investment adviser to transact business in this State as a
federal covered investment adviser unless the federal covered investment
adviser complies with subsection (c).

(b) The following federal covered investment
advisers are not required to comply with subsection (c):

(1) A federal covered investment adviser without a
place of business in this State if its only clients in this State are:

(A) Federal covered investment advisers,
investment advisers registered under this chapter, and broker-dealers
registered under this chapter;

(B) Institutional investors;

(C) Bona fide preexisting clients whose
principal places of residence are not in this State; or

(D) Other clients specified by rule adopted
or order issued under this chapter;

(2) A federal covered investment adviser without a
place of business in this State if the person has had, during the preceding
twelve months, not more than five clients that are residents of this State in
addition to those specified under paragraph (1); or

(3) Any other person excluded by rule adopted
or order issued under this chapter.

(c) A person acting as a federal covered
investment adviser not excluded under subsection (b) shall file a notice on a
form designated by the commissioner, a consent to service of process complying
with section 485A-610, and records that have been filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as required by
rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, and pay the fees specified in
section 485A-410(e).

(d) The notice under subsection (c) becomes
effective upon its filing. [L 2006, c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next